Hawaii statutes.
[§414-201] Compensation of directors.
Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of
directors may fix the compensation of directors. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next